Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2305
Notice; form.

(1) A notice given to a former tenant which is in substantially the following form shall satisfy the requirements of section 69-2303:

Notice of Right to Reclaim Abandoned Property

To: .................................................

(Name of former tenant)

....................................................

(Address of former tenant)

When you vacated the premises at

................................................... ,

(Address of premises, including room or apartment number, if any)

the following personal property remained:

........................................................

(Insert description of the personal property)

You may claim this property at ......................

....................................................... .

(Address where property may be claimed)

Unless you pay the reasonable costs of storage for all the above-described property and take possession of the property which you claim not later than ........, (insert date not less than seven days after notice is personally delivered or, if mailed, not less than fourteen days after notice is deposited in the mail) this property may be disposed of pursuant to the Disposition of Personal Property Landlord and Tenant Act.

(Insert here the statement required by section 69-2304)

Dated: ......................

.............................

(Signature of landlord)

.............................

(Type or print name of landlord)

.............................

(Telephone number)

.............................

(Address)

(2) A notice which is in substantially the following form given to a person other than a former tenant whom the landlord reasonably believes to be the owner of personal property shall satisfy the requirements of section 69-2303:

Notice of Right to Reclaim Abandoned Property

To: ....................................................

(Name)

........................................................

(Address)

When .......................... vacated the premises at

(Name of former tenant)

.......................................................,

(Address of premises, including room or apartment number, if any)

the following personal property remained:

.......................................................

(Insert description of the personal property)

If you own any of this property, you may claim it at

........................................................ .

(Address where property may be claimed)

Unless you pay the reasonable costs of storage and take possession of the property to which you are entitled not later than ............., (insert date not less than seven days after notice is personally delivered or, if mailed, not less than fourteen days after notice is deposited in mail) this property may be disposed of pursuant to the Disposition of Personal Property Landlord and Tenant Act.

(Insert here the statement required by section 69-2304)

Dated: ......................

.............................

(Signature of landlord)

.............................

(Type or print name of landlord)

.............................

(Telephone number)

.............................

(Address)

Laws 1991, LB 36, § 5.